Utah statutes.
31A-26-205.   Character requirements.

Each applicant for a license under this chapter shall show to the commissioner that:

(1)  he has the good faith intent to engage in the type of business the license or licenses applied for would permit;

(2)  if a natural person, he is competent and trustworthy, or that, if an organization, all the partners, directors, principal officers, or persons in fact having comparable powers are trustworthy, and that it will transact business in such a way that all acts that may only be performed by a licensed adjuster are performed exclusively by natural persons who are licensed under this chapter to transact that business and listed on the organization's license under Section 31A-26-209; and

(3)  if a natural person, he is at least 18 years of age.

